Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1628HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 302 Section 1. Section 159A.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. It is necessary to support industries using agricultural 3 commodities to increase the demand for and production and 4 consumption of sources of energy in order to reduce the stateâs 5 dependency upon petroleum products; to reduce atmospheric 6 contamination of this stateâs environment from the combustion 7 of fossil fuels; and to produce coproducts, such as corn gluten 8 feed, distillers grain, and solubles, which can be used to 9 increase livestock production in this state. 10 Sec. 2. Section 479B.9, Code 2025, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 479B.9 Final order ââ condition. 13 The commission may grant a permit in whole or in part upon 14 terms, conditions, and restrictions as to location and route 15 as it determines to be just and proper. The commission shall 16 not consider climate change when determining whether to grant 17 a permit. A permit shall not be granted to a pipeline company 18 unless the commission determines that the proposed services 19 will promote the public convenience and necessity. 20